Hawaii, session 2026, HB2321.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1. Section 329-14, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended as follows: 1.  By amending subsection (b) to read: "(b)  Opiates. Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any of the following opiates, including their isomers, esters, ethers, salts, and salts of isomers, esters, and ethers, whenever the existence of these isomers, esters, ethers, and salts is possible within the specific chemical designation: (1)  Acetyl-alpha-methylfentanyl (N-[1-(1-methyl-2-phenethyl)-4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylacetamide); (2)  Acetylmethadol; (3)  Acetyl fentanyl (N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylacetamide), its optical, positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers; (4)  Acryl fentanyl [N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylacrylamide] (Other name:  acryloylfentanyl); (5)  AH-7921 (3,4-dichloro-N-[(1-dimethylamino)cyclohexylmethyl]benzamide); (6)  Allylprodine; (7)  Alphacetylmethadol (except levo-alphacetylmethadol, levomethadyl acetate, or LAAM); (8)  Alphameprodine; (9)  Alphamethadol; (10)  Alpha'-methyl butyryl fentanyl (2-methyl-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylbutanamide); (11)  Alpha-methylfentanyl (N-[1-(alpha-methyl-beta-phenyl)ethyl-4-piperidyl]propionanilide; 1-(1-methyl-2-phenylethyl)-4-(N-propanilido)piperidine); (12)  Alpha-methylthiofentanyl (N-[1-methyl-2-(2-thienyl)ethyl-4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylpropanamide); (13)  Benzethidine; (14)  Benzylfentanyl (N-[1-benzyl-4-piperidyl]-N- phenylpropanamide), its optical isomers, salts, and salts of isomers; (15)  Betacetylmethadol; (16)  Beta-hydroxyfentanyl (N-[1-(2-hydroxy-2-phenethyl)-4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylpropanamide); (17)  Beta-hydroxy-3-methylfentanyl (N-[1-(2-hydroxy-2-phenethyl)-3-methyl-4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylpropanamide); (18)  Beta-hydroxythiofentanyl (N-[1-[2-hydroxy-2-(thiophen-2-yl)ethyl]piperidin-4-yl]-N-phenylpropionamide); (19)  Betameprodine; (20)  Betamethadol; (21)  Beta-methyl fentanyl (N-phenyl-N-(1-(2-phenylpropyl)piperidin-4-yl)propionamide) (Other name:  [beta]-methyl fentanyl); (22)  Beta-methylacetyl fentanyl (N -phenyl-N-(1-(2-phenylpropyl)piperidin-4-yl)acetamide); [(22)] (23)  Beta'-phenyl fentanyl (N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N,3-diphenylpropanamide) (Other names:  [beta]'-phenyl fentanyl; 3-phenylpropanoyl fentanyl); [(23)] (24)  Betaprodine; [(24)] (25)  Brorphine (1-(1-(1-(4-bromophenyl)ethyl)piperidin-4-yl)-1,3-dihydro-2H-benzo[d]imidazol-2-one); [(25)] (26) Butonitazene (2-(2-(4-butoxybenzyl)-5-nitro-1H-benzimidazol-1-yl)-N,N-diethylethan-1-amine); [(26)] (27) Butyryl fentanyl (N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylbutyramide); [(27)] (28) Clonitazene; [(28)] (29) Crotonyl fentanyl ((E)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylbut-2-enamide); [(29)] (30) Cyclopentyl fentanyl (N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylcyclopentanecarboxamide); [(30)] (31) Cyclopropyl fentanyl (N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylcyclopropanecarboxamide); [(31)] (32) Dextromoramide; [(32)] (33) Diampromide; [(33)] (34) Diethylthiambutene; [(34)] (35) Difenoxin; [(35)] (36) Dimenoxadol; [(36)] (37) Dimepheptanol; [(37)] (38) 2',5'-dimethoxyfentanyl (N-(1-(2,5-dimethoxyphenethyl)piperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylpropionamide); [(38)] (39)  Dimethylthiambutene; [(39)] (40)  Dioxaphetyl butyrate; [(40)] (41)  Dipipanone; [(41)] (42)  Ethylmethylthiambutene; [(42)] (43)  Etodesnitazene (2-(2-(4-ethoxybenzyl)-1H-benzimidazol-1-yl)-N,N-diethylethan-1-amine) (Other name:  etazene); [(43)] (44)  Etonitazene; [(44)] (45)  Etoxeridine; [(45)] (46)  Fentanyl carbamate (ethyl (1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)(phenyl)carbamate); [(46)] (47) Flunitazene (N,N-diethyl-2-(2-(4-fluorobenzyl)-5-nitro-1H-benzimidazol-1-yl)ethan-1-amine); [(47)] (48) 4-fluoroisobutyryl fentanyl [N-(4-fluorophenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)isobutyramide] (Other name:  para-fluoroisobutyryl fentanyl); [(48)] (49) 2'-fluoro ortho-fluorofentanyl (N-(1-(2-fluorophenethyl)piperidin-4-yl)-N-(2-fluorophenyl)propionamide) (Other name:  2'-fluoro 2-fluorofentanyl); [(49)] (50) Furanyl fentanyl (N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-y1)-N-phenylfuran-2-carboxamide); [(50)] (51) 3-furanyl fentanyl (N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylfuran-3-carboxamide); [(51)] (52) Furethidine; [(52)] (53) Hydroxypethidine; [(53)] (54) Isobutyryl fentanyl (N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylisobutyramide); [(54)] (55) Isotonitazene (N,N-diethyl-2-(2-(4-isopropoxybenzyl)-5-nitro-1H-benzimidazol-1-yl)ethan-1-amine); [(55)] (56) Isovaleryl fentanyl (3-methyl-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylbutanamide); [(56)] (57) Ketobemidone; [(57)] (58) Levomoramide; [(58)] (59) Levophenacylmorphan; [(59)] (60) Meta-fluorofentanyl (N-(3-fluorophenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)propionamide); (61)  Meta-fluorofuranyl fentanyl (N-(3-fluorophenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)furan-2-carboxamide); [(60)] (62) Meta-fluoroisobutyryl fentanyl (N-(3-fluorophenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)isobutyramide); [(61)] (63)  Methoxyacetyl fentanyl (2-methoxy-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylacetamide); [(62)  2-methyl AP-237 (1-(2-methyl-4-(3-phenylprop-2-en-1-yl)piperazin-1-yl)butan-1-one); (63)] (64)  4'-methyl acetyl fentanyl (N-(1-(4-methylphenethyl)piperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylacetamide); (65)  2-methyl AP-237 (1-(2-methyl-4-(3-phenylprop-2-en-1-yl)piperazin-1-yl)butan-1-one); [(64)] (66)  3-methylfentanyl (N-[3-methyl-1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-piperidyl]-N-phenylpropanamide); [(65)] (67)  3-methylthiofentanyl (N-[3-methyl-1-(2-thienyl)ethyl-4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylpropanamide); [(66)] (68) Metodesnitazene (N,N-diethyl-2-(2-(4-methoxybenzyl)-1H-benzimidazol-1-yl)ethan-1-amine); [(67)] (69) Metonitazene (N,N-diethyl-2-(2-(4-methoxybenzyl)-5-nitro-1H-benzimidazol-1-yl)ethan-1-amine); [(68)] (70)  Morpheridine; [(69)] (71)  MPPP (1-methyl-4-phenyl-4-propionoxypiperidine); [(70)] (72)  MT-45 (1-cyclohexyl-4-(1,2-diphenylethyl)piperazine); [(71)] (73)  Noracymethadol; [(72)] (74)  Norlevorphanol; [(73)] (75)  Normethadone; [(74)] (76)  Norpipanone; [(75)] (77)  N-pyrrolidino etonitazene (2-(4-ethoxybenzyl)-5-nitro-1-(2-(pyrrolidin-1-yl)ethyl)-1H-benzimidazole) (Other name:  etonitazepyne); (78)  N-pyrrolidino metonitazene (2-(4-methoxybenzyl)-5-nitro-1-(2-(pyrrolidin-1-yl)ethyl)-1H-benzimidazole) (Other name:  metonitazepyne); (79)  N-pyrrolidino protonitazene (5-nitro-2-(4-propoxybenzyl)-1-(2-(pyrrolidin-1-yl)ethyl)-1H-benzimidazole) (Other name:  protonitazepyne); [(76)] (80)  Ocfentanil [N-(2-fluorophenyl)-2-methoxy-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)acetamide]; (81)  Ortho-chlorofentanyl (N-(2-chlorophenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)propionamide); [(77)] (82)  Ortho-fluoroacryl fentanyl (N-(2-fluorophenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)acrylamide); [(78)] (83)  Ortho-fluorobutyryl fentanyl (N-(2-fluorophenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)butyramide) (Other name:  2-fluorobutyryl fentanyl); [(79)] (84)  Ortho-fluorofentanyl (N-(2-fluorophenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)propionamide) (Other name:  2-fluorofentanyl); [(80)] (85)  Ortho-fluorofuranyl fentanyl (N-(2-fluorophenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)furan-2-carboxamide); [(81)] (86)  Ortho-fluoroisobutyryl fentanyl (N-(2-fluorophenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)isobutyramide); [(82)] (87)  Ortho-methyl acetylfentanyl (N-(2-methylphenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)acetamide) (Other name:  2-methyl acetylfentanyl); (88)  Ortho-methylcyclopropyl fentanyl (N-(2-methylphenyl)- N -(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)cyclopropanecarboxamide); [(83)] (89)  Ortho-methyl methoxyacetyl fentanyl (2-methoxy-N-(2-methylphenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)acetamide) (Other name:  2-methyl methoxyacetyl fentanyl); (90)  Para-chlorofentanyl (N-(4-chlorophenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)propionamide); [(84)] (91)  Para-chloroisobutyryl fentanyl (N-(4-chlorophenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)isobutyramide); [(85)] (92) Para-fluorobutyryl fentanyl (N-(4-fluorophenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)butyramide); [(86)] (93) Para-fluorofentanyl (N-(4-fluorophenyl)-N-[1-(2-phenethyl)-4-piperidinyl]propanamide); [(87)] (94)  Para-fluoro furanyl fentanyl (N-(4-fluorophenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)furan-2-carboxamide); (95)  Para-fluoro valeryl fentanyl (N-(4-fluorophenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)pentanamide); [(88)] (96) Para-methoxybutyryl fentanyl (N-(4-methoxyphenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)butyramide); [(89)] (97) Para-methoxyfuranyl fentanyl (N-(4-methoxyphenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)furan-2-carboxamide); [(90)] (98) Para-methylcyclopropyl fentanyl (N-(4-methylphenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)cyclopropanecarboxamide); [(91)] (99)  Para-methylfentanyl (N-(4-methylphenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)propionamide) (Other name:  4-methylfentanyl); [(92)] (100)  PEPAP (1-(-2-phenethyl)-4-phenyl-4-acetoxypiperidine); [(93)] (101)  Phenadoxone; [(94)] (102)  Phenampromide; [(95)] (103)  Phenomorphan; [(96)] (104)  Phenoperidine; [(97)] (105)  Phenyl fentanyl (N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylbenzamide) (Other name:  benzoyl fentanyl); [(98)] (106) Piritramide; [(99)] (107) Proheptazine; [(100)] (108) Properidine; [(101)] (109)  Propiram; [(102)] (110)  Protonitazene (N,N-diethyl-2-(5-nitro-2-(4-propoxybenzyl)-1H-benzimidazol-1-yl)ethan-1-amine); [(103)] (111) Racemoramide; [(104)] (112) Tetrahydrofuranyl fentanyl (N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenyltetrahydrofuran-2-carboxamide); (113)  Tetrahydrothiofuranyl fentanyl (N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenyltetrahydrothiophene-2-carboxamide) (Other name:  tetrahydrothiophene fentanyl); [(105)] (114)  Thenylfentanyl (N-[1-(2-thienyl)methyl-4-piperidyl]-N-phenylpropanamide), its optical isomers, salts, and salts of isomers; [(106)] (115)  Thiofentanyl (N-phenyl-N-[1-(2-thienyl)ethyl-4-piperidinyl]-propanamide); [(107)] (116)  Thiofuranyl fentanyl (N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylthiophene-2-carboxamide) (Other names:  2-thiofuranyl fentanyl; thiophene fentanyl); [(108)] (117)  Tilidine; [(109)] (118)  Trimeperidine; [(110)] (119)  U-47700 (3,4-dichloro-N-[2-(dimethylamino)cyclohexyl]-N-methylbenzamide); and [(111)] (120) Valeryl fentanyl (N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylpentanamide)." 2.  By amending subsection (e) to read: "(e)  Depressants. Unless specifically excepted[, the schedule shall include] or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation [which] that contains any quantity of the [substance:] following substances having a depressant effect on the central nervous system, including its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers, whenever the existence of the salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation: [(1)  Mecloqualone; (2)  Methaqualone;] (1)  Clonazolam (6-(2-chlorophenyl)-1-methyl-8-nitro-4H-benzo[f][1,2,4]triazolo[4,3-a][1,4]diazepine); (2)  Diclazepam (7-chloro-5-(2-chlorophenyl)-1-methyl-1,3-dihydro-2H-benzo[e][1,4]diazepin-2-one); (3)  Etizolam (4-(2-chlorophenyl)-2-ethyl-9-methyl-6H-thieno[3,2-f][1,2,4]triazolo[4,3-a][1,4]diazepine) (including its optical, positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers, where possible); [or] (4)  Flualprazolam (8-chloro-6-(2-fluorophenyl)-1-methyl-4H-benzo[f][1,2,4]triazolo[4,3-a][1,4]diazepine) (including its optical, positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers, where possible)[.]; (5)  Flubromazolam (8-bromo-6-(2-fluorophenyl)-1-methyl-4H-benzo[f][1,2,4]triazolo[4,3-a][1,4]diazepine); (6)  Mecloqualone; or (7)  Methaqualone." SECTION 2. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.